Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.72.028

Public investment impact disclosures—Appeal to superior court.

Any persons, including either or both houses of the legislature, dissatisfied with the public investment impact disclosure for a state initiative or referendum may, within three days from the filing of the public investment impact disclosure in the office of the secretary of state, appeal to the superior court of Thurston county by petition setting forth the measure, the public investment impact disclosure, and their objections to the public investment impact disclosure and requesting amendment of the public investment impact disclosure by the court. Saturdays, Sundays, and legal holidays are not counted in calculating the time limits contained in this section.

A copy of the petition on appeal together with a notice that an appeal has been taken shall be served upon the secretary of state, upon the attorney general, and upon the person proposing the measure if the appeal is initiated by someone other than that person. Upon the filing of the petition on appeal or at the time to which the hearing may be adjourned by consent of the appellant, the court shall accord first priority to examining the proposed measure, the public investment impact disclosure, and the objections to that public investment impact disclosure, may hear arguments, and shall, within five days, render its decision and file with the secretary of state a certified copy of such public investment impact disclosure as it determines will meet the requirements of RCW 29A.72.027. The decision of the superior court shall be final. Such appeal shall be heard without costs to either party.

[ 2022 c 114 s 6.]

NOTES:

Findings—2022 c 114: See note following RCW 29A.72.027.